test/src/morphology/izh-test-A-kalakas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - kalakas: # Adjective 'with plenty of fish'
     kalakas+A+Sg+Nom: kalakas
     kalakas+A+Sg+Gen: kalakkaan
     kalakas+A+Sg+Acc: kalakkaan
     kalakas+A+Sg+Par: kalakasta
     kalakas+A+Sg+Ill: kalakkaasse
     kalakas+A+Sg+Ine: kalakkaas
     kalakas+A+Sg+Ela: kalakkaast
     kalakas+A+Sg+All: kalakkaalle
     kalakas+A+Sg+Ade: kalakkaal
     kalakas+A+Sg+Abl: kalakkaalt
     kalakas+A+Sg+Tra: kalakkaaks
     kalakas+A+Sg+Ess: [kalakkaan, kalakkaanna]
     kalakas+A+Sg+Exe: kalakkaant

     kalakas+A+Pl+Nom: kalakkaat
     kalakas+A+Pl+Gen: kalakkain
     kalakas+A+Pl+Acc: kalakkaat
     kalakas+A+Pl+Par: kalakkaita
     kalakas+A+Pl+Ill: kalakkaisse
     kalakas+A+Pl+Ine: kalakkais
     kalakas+A+Pl+Ela: kalakkaist
     kalakas+A+Pl+All: kalakkaille
     kalakas+A+Pl+Ade: kalakkail
     kalakas+A+Pl+Abl: kalakkailt
     kalakas+A+Pl+Tra: kalakkaiks
     kalakas+A+Pl+Ess: [kalakkain, kalakkainna]
     kalakas+A+Pl+Exe: kalakkaint
